Tennessee, session 114, SB2377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-227(a), is amended by deleting
the second sentence of the subsection and substituting:
The department shall update the list by July 1 each year.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2377
012536
- 1 -